District of Columbia statutes.
44-1002.02

Grounds for receivership.

A receiver may be appointed under this subchapter on one or more of the following grounds:

(1)

The facility is unlawfully operating without a current District license;

(2)

The licensee has abandoned the facility;

(3)

The facility is closing within 30 calendar days and cannot offer verifiable evidence that adequate arrangements, designed to minimize transfer trauma, have been made to relocate its residents;

(4)

A condition or practice in the facility poses a serious, widespread danger, either immediate or recurring, to the health, safety, or welfare of the residents;

(5)

Violations of residents’ rights, established pursuant to § 44-504(a)(4), are chronic, substantial, and widespread;

(6)

Insolvency of an owner or the licensee has placed the continued operation of the facility in serious jeopardy; or

(7)

The facility has been issued a restricted or provisional license by the Department of Health.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 202, 33 DCR 1510
Apr. 29, 2010, D.C. Law 18-145, § 4(a), 57 DCR 1834

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-1002.03, § 44-1002.05, and § 44-1002.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1412.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-145 deleted “or” from the end of par. (5); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of par. (6); and added par. (7).